Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1856.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2355, as


last amended by Section 2, Chapter 307, O.S.L. 2025 (68 O.S. Supp.


2025, Section 2355), is amended to read as follows:


Section 2355. A. Individuals. For all taxable years beginning


after December 31, 1998, and before January 1, 2006, a tax is hereby


imposed upon the Oklahoma taxable income of every resident or


nonresident individual, which tax shall be computed at the option of


the taxpayer under one of the two following methods:


1. METHOD 1.



Req. No. 3473 Page 1


a. Single individuals and married individuals filing


separately not deducting federal income tax:


(1) 1/2% tax on first $1,000.00 or part thereof,


(2) 1% tax on next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(3) 2% tax on next $1,250.00 or part thereof,


(4) 3% tax on next $1,150.00 or part thereof,


(5) 4% tax on next $1,300.00 or part thereof,


(6) 5% tax on next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(7) 6% tax on next $2,300.00 or part thereof, and


(8) (a) for taxable years beginning after December


31, 1998, and before January 1, 2002, 6.75%


tax on the remainder,


(b) for taxable years beginning on or after


January 1, 2002, and before January 1, 2004,


7% tax on the remainder, and


(c) for taxable years beginning on or after


January 1, 2004, 6.65% tax on the remainder.


b. Married individuals filing jointly and surviving


spouse to the extent and in the manner that a


surviving spouse is permitted to file a joint return


under the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of


1986, as amended, and heads of households as defined


in the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, not


deducting federal income tax:

Req. No. 3473 Page 2


(1) 1/2% tax on first $2,000.00 or part thereof,


(2) 1% tax on next $3,000.00 or part thereof,


(3) 2% tax on next $2,500.00 or part thereof,


(4) 3% tax on next $2,300.00 or part thereof,


(5) 4% tax on next $2,400.00 or part thereof,


(6) 5% tax on next $2,800.00 or part thereof,


(7) 6% tax on next $6,000.00 or part thereof, and


(8) (a) for taxable years beginning after December


31, 1998, and before January 1, 2002, 6.75%


tax on the remainder,


(b) for taxable years beginning on or after


January 1, 2002, and before January 1, 2004,


7% tax on the remainder, and


(c) for taxable years beginning on or after


January 1, 2004, 6.65% tax on the remainder.


2. METHOD 2.


a. Single individuals and married individuals filing


separately deducting federal income tax:


(1) 1/2% tax on first $1,000.00 or part thereof,


(2) 1% tax on next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(3) 2% tax on next $1,250.00 or part thereof,


(4) 3% tax on next $1,150.00 or part thereof,


(5) 4% tax on next $1,200.00 or part thereof,


(6) 5% tax on next $1,400.00 or part thereof,

Req. No. 3473 Page 3


(7) 6% tax on next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(8) 7% tax on next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(9) 8% tax on next $2,000.00 or part thereof,


(10) 9% tax on next $3,500.00 or part thereof, and


(11) 10% tax on the remainder.


b. Married individuals filing jointly and surviving


spouse to the extent and in the manner that a


surviving spouse is permitted to file a joint return


under the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of


1986, as amended, and heads of households as defined


in the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,


deducting federal income tax:


(1) 1/2% tax on the first $2,000.00 or part thereof,


(2) 1% tax on the next $3,000.00 or part thereof,


(3) 2% tax on the next $2,500.00 or part thereof,


(4) 3% tax on the next $1,400.00 or part thereof,


(5) 4% tax on the next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(6) 5% tax on the next $1,600.00 or part thereof,


(7) 6% tax on the next $1,250.00 or part thereof,


(8) 7% tax on the next $1,750.00 or part thereof,


(9) 8% tax on the next $3,000.00 or part thereof,


(10) 9% tax on the next $6,000.00 or part thereof, and


(11) 10% tax on the remainder.



Req. No. 3473 Page 4


B. Individuals. For all taxable years beginning on or after


January 1, 2008, and ending any tax year which begins after December


31, 2015, for which the determination required pursuant to Sections


2355.1F and 2355.1G of this title is made by the State Board of


Equalization, a tax is hereby imposed upon the Oklahoma taxable


income of every resident or nonresident individual, which tax shall


be computed as follows:


1. Single individuals and married individuals filing


separately:


(a) 1/2% tax on first $1,000.00 or part thereof,


(b) 1% tax on next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(c) 2% tax on next $1,250.00 or part thereof,


(d) 3% tax on next $1,150.00 or part thereof,


(e) 4% tax on next $2,300.00 or part thereof,


(f) 5% tax on next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(g) 5.50% tax on the remainder for the 2008 tax year and


any subsequent tax year unless the rate prescribed by


subparagraph (h) of this paragraph is in effect, and


(h) 5.25% tax on the remainder for the 2009 and subsequent


tax years. The decrease in the top marginal


individual income tax rate otherwise authorized by


this subparagraph shall be contingent upon the


determination required to be made by the State Board



Req. No. 3473 Page 5


of Equalization pursuant to Section 2355.1A of this


title.


2. Married individuals filing jointly and surviving spouse to


the extent and in the manner that a surviving spouse is permitted to


file a joint return under the provisions of the Internal Revenue


Code of 1986, as amended, and heads of households as defined in the


Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended:


(a) 1/2% tax on first $2,000.00 or part thereof,


(b) 1% tax on next $3,000.00 or part thereof,


(c) 2% tax on next $2,500.00 or part thereof,


(d) 3% tax on next $2,300.00 or part thereof,


(e) 4% tax on next $2,400.00 or part thereof,


(f) 5% tax on next $2,800.00 or part thereof,


(g) 5.50% tax on the remainder for the 2008 tax year and


any subsequent tax year unless the rate prescribed by


subparagraph (h) of this paragraph is in effect, and


(h) 5.25% tax on the remainder for the 2009 and subsequent


tax years. The decrease in the top marginal


individual income tax rate otherwise authorized by


this subparagraph shall be contingent upon the


determination required to be made by the State Board


of Equalization pursuant to Section 2355.1A of this


title.



Req. No. 3473 Page 6


C. Individuals. For tax years 2024 and 2025, a tax is hereby


imposed upon the Oklahoma taxable income of every resident or


nonresident individual, which tax shall be computed as follows:


1. Single individuals and married individuals filing


separately:


(a) 0.25% tax on first $1,000.00 or part thereof,


(b) 0.75% tax on next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(c) 1.75% tax on next $1,250.00 or part thereof,


(d) 2.75% tax on next $1,150.00 or part thereof,


(e) 3.75% tax on next $2,300.00 or part thereof, and


(f) 4.75% tax on the remainder.


2. Married individuals filing jointly and surviving spouse to


the extent and in the manner that a surviving spouse is permitted to


file a joint return under the provisions of the Internal Revenue


Code of 1986, as amended, and heads of households as defined in the


Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended:


(a) 0.25% tax on first $2,000.00 or part thereof,


(b) 0.75% tax on next $3,000.00 or part thereof,


(c) 1.75% tax on next $2,500.00 or part thereof,


(d) 2.75% tax on next $2,300.00 or part thereof,


(e) 3.75% tax on next $4,600.00 or part thereof, and


(f) 4.75% tax on the remainder.


No deduction for federal income taxes paid shall be allowed to


any taxpayer to arrive at taxable income.

Req. No. 3473 Page 7


D. Individuals. For tax year 2026 and for subsequent tax years


subject to rate reductions as provided by subsection subsections E


and L of this section, a tax is hereby imposed upon the Oklahoma


taxable income of every resident or nonresident individual, which


tax shall be computed as follows:


1. Single individuals and married individuals filing


separately:


(a) 0% tax on first $3,750.00 or part thereof,


(b) 2.5% tax on the next $1,150.00 or part thereof,


(c) 3.5% tax on next $2,300.00 or part thereof, and


(d) 4.5% tax on the remainder.


2. Married individuals filing jointly and surviving spouse to


the extent and in the manner that a surviving spouse is permitted to


file a joint return under the provisions of the Internal Revenue


Code of 1986, as amended, and heads of households as defined in the


Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended:


(a) 0% tax on first $7,500.00 or part thereof,


(b) 2.5% tax on the next $2,300.00 or part thereof,


(c) 3.5% tax on next $4,600.00 or part thereof, and


(d) 4.5% tax on the remainder.


No deduction for federal income taxes paid shall be allowed to


any taxpayer to arrive at taxable income.


E. As provided by subsection D of Section 34.103 of Title 62 of


the Oklahoma Statutes, if the comparison year total collections

Req. No. 3473 Page 8


exceeds the base year total collections plus the income tax rate


reduction threshold, as certified by the State Board of Equalization


pursuant to paragraph 2 of subsection D of Section 34.103 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes, the tax rates otherwise prescribed in


paragraphs 1 and 2 of subsection D of this section shall each be


reduced by twenty-five one-hundredths (0.25) of a percentage point


(0.0025) until the applicable rate equals zero percent (0%). Each


successive certification by the State Board of Equalization with


respect to which the comparison year total collections exceeds the


base year total collections plus the income tax rate reduction


threshold, as determined by the State Board of Equalization as


provided by subsection D of Section 34.103 of Title 62 of the


Oklahoma Statutes, shall further reduce the individual income tax


rates by twenty-five one-hundredths (0.25) of a percentage point


(0.0025) until the applicable rate equals zero percent (0%). Any


reduction in the income tax rates authorized by this section and by


this act Sections 34.103 and 34.103A of Title 62 of the Oklahoma


Statutes shall take effect on January 1 following the final


certification by the State Board of Equalization, if any, made


during its meeting in February each year.


F. If a revenue failure is declared pursuant to the provisions


of Section 34.49 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes prior to the


end of the calendar year in which the Board makes a certification


pursuant to paragraph 2 of subsection D of Section 34.103 of Title

Req. No. 3473 Page 9


of the Oklahoma Statutes, the reduction in tax rates, as


otherwise provided for in this section, shall not occur until a


subsequent certification is made by the State Board of Equalization


pursuant to paragraph 2 of subsection D of Section 34.103 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes.


G. Nonresident aliens. In lieu of the rates set forth in


subsection A above, there shall be imposed on nonresident aliens, as


defined in the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, a tax of


eight percent (8%) instead of thirty percent (30%) as used in the


Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, with respect to the


Oklahoma taxable income of such nonresident aliens as determined


under the provision of the Oklahoma Income Tax Act.


Every payer of amounts covered by this subsection shall deduct


and withhold from such amounts paid each payee an amount equal to


eight percent (8%) thereof. Every payer required to deduct and


withhold taxes under this subsection shall for each quarterly period


on or before the last day of the month following the close of each


such quarterly period, pay over the amount so withheld as taxes to


the Oklahoma Tax Commission, and shall file a return with each such


payment. Such return shall be in such form as the Tax Commission


shall prescribe. Every payer required under this subsection to


deduct and withhold a tax from a payee shall, as to the total


amounts paid to each payee during the calendar year, furnish to such


payee, on or before January 31 of the succeeding year, a written

Req. No. 3473 Page 10


statement showing the name of the payer, the name of the payee and


the payee’s Social Security account number, if any, the total amount


paid subject to taxation, and the total amount deducted and withheld


as tax and such other information as the Tax Commission may require.


Any payer who fails to withhold or pay to the Tax Commission any


sums herein required to be withheld or paid shall be personally and


individually liable therefor to the State of Oklahoma.


H. Corporations. For all taxable years beginning after


December 31, 2021, a tax is hereby imposed upon the Oklahoma taxable


income of every corporation doing business within this state or


deriving income from sources within this state in an amount equal to


four percent (4%) thereof.


There shall be no additional Oklahoma income tax imposed on


accumulated taxable income or on undistributed personal holding


company income as those terms are defined in the Internal Revenue


Code of 1986, as amended.


I. Certain foreign corporations. In lieu of the tax imposed in


the first paragraph of subsection G of this section, for all taxable


years beginning after December 31, 2021, there shall be imposed on


foreign corporations, as defined in the Internal Revenue Code of


1986, as amended, a tax of four percent (4%) instead of thirty


percent (30%) as used in the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as


amended, where such income is received from sources within this



Req. No. 3473 Page 11


state, in accordance with the provisions of the Internal Revenue


Code of 1986, as amended, and the Oklahoma Income Tax Act.


Every payer of amounts covered by this subsection shall deduct


and withhold from such amounts paid each payee an amount equal to


four percent (4%) thereof. Every payer required to deduct and


withhold taxes under this subsection shall for each quarterly period


on or before the last day of the month following the close of each


such quarterly period, pay over the amount so withheld as taxes to


the Tax Commission, and shall file a return with each such payment.


Such return shall be in such form as the Tax Commission shall


prescribe. Every payer required under this subsection to deduct and


withhold a tax from a payee shall, as to the total amounts paid to


each payee during the calendar year, furnish to such payee, on or


before January 31 of the succeeding year, a written statement


showing the name of the payer, the name of the payee and the payee’s


Social Security account number, if any, the total amounts paid


subject to taxation, the total amount deducted and withheld as tax,


and such other information as the Tax Commission may require. Any


payer who fails to withhold or pay to the Tax Commission any sums


herein required to be withheld or paid shall be personally and


individually liable therefor to the State of Oklahoma.


J. Fiduciaries. A tax is hereby imposed upon the Oklahoma


taxable income of every trust and estate at the same rates as are


provided in subsections B through D of this section for single

Req. No. 3473 Page 12


individuals. Fiduciaries are not allowed a deduction for any


federal income tax paid.


K. Tax rate tables. For all taxable years beginning after


December 31, 1991, in lieu of the tax imposed by subsections A


through D of this section, as applicable there is hereby imposed for


each taxable year on the taxable income of every individual, whose


taxable income for such taxable year does not exceed the ceiling


amount, a tax determined under tables, applicable to such taxable


year which shall be prescribed by the Tax Commission and which shall


be in such form as it determines appropriate. In the table so


prescribed, the amounts of the tax shall be computed on the basis of


the rates prescribed by subsections A through D of this section.


For purposes of this subsection, the term “ceiling amount” means,


with respect to any taxpayer, the amount determined by the Tax


Commission for the tax rate category in which such taxpayer falls.


L. 1. Beginning tax year 2027, in addition to any rate


reductions provided for in subsection E of this section, if the


comparison year total collections reported pursuant to the


provisions of Section 34.103 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes


for the December meeting of the State Board of Equalization


immediately preceding the tax year exceed the comparison year total


collections reported in the immediate preceding December meeting by


at least Two Hundred Million Dollars ($200,000,000.00), the tax


rates otherwise prescribed in paragraphs 1 and 2 of subsection D of

Req. No. 3473 Page 13


this section shall each be reduced by the following percentage


points until the applicable rate equals zero percent (0%):


a. if the excess is at least Two Hundred Million Dollars


($200,000,000.00) but less than Three Hundred Million


Dollars ($300,000,000.00), one hundred twenty-five


one-thousandths (0.125) of a percentage point,


b. if the excess is at least Three Hundred Million


Dollars ($300,000,000.00) but less than Four Hundred


Million Dollars ($400,000,000.00), twenty-five one-


hundredths (0.25) of a percentage point,


c. if the excess is at least Four Hundred Million Dollars


($400,000,000.00) but less than Five Hundred Million


Dollars ($500,000,000.00), three hundred seventy-five


one-thousandths (0.375) of a percentage point, and


d. if the excess is at least Five Hundred Million Dollars


($500,000,000.00), fifty one-hundredths (0.50) of a


percentage point.


2. Any increment of comparison year total collections above the


minimum thresholds provided pursuant to subparagraphs a through c of


paragraph 1 of this subsection that do not exceed the minimum


threshold of the subsequent subparagraph, or any increment above the


minimum threshold provided by subparagraph d of paragraph 1 of this


subsection, shall be added to the comparison year total collections


certified in the subsequent December meeting of the State Board of

Req. No. 3473 Page 14


Equalization for the purpose of calculating the rate reductions


required by this subsection.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3473 QD 1/15/2026 1:26:04 AM







































Req. No. 3473 Page 15